Louisiana, session 2026, HB211.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 33-D of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 13:5381 through 5386, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 33-D. HOMELESSNESS COURT PROGRAM
§5381. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Homelessness Court
Program Act".
§5382. Purpose
The Legislature of Louisiana recognizes that there is a critical need for
criminal justice system programs to assist those persons who are experiencing
homelessness in order to reduce the incidence of substance abuse disorders, untreated
Page 1 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
mental health issues, destruction and disruption of use of public property, significant
public health and safety issues, and crimes committed by those experiencing
homelessness. There is also a need for programs to assist those experiencing
homelessness with mental health issues, including mental health diagnoses and
undiagnosed mental illnesses. Moreover, many experiencing homelessness suffer
from co-occurring disorders of substance abuse and mental illness. These problems
can cause those experiencing homelessness to have involvement with the criminal
justice system. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature of Louisiana to create
specialized court programs in the various districts of this state called "Homelessness
Court programs" to assist those experiencing homelessness in overcoming these
issues, as they impact themselves, the criminal justice system, and society at large.
The goals of these programs are to reduce recidivism among those experiencing
homelessness and to provide them with the assistance that they need to become
productive members of society.
§5383. Goals
The goals of the Homelessness Court program created pursuant to this
Chapter include all of the following:
(1) To reduce drug abuse and alcoholism and dependency among persons
experiencing homelessness.
(2) To reduce the alcohol and drug-related workload of the courts.
(3) To reduce criminal recidivism.
(4) To diagnose undiagnosed mental health problems and to assist in the care
and treatment of diagnosed mental health illnesses.
(5) To increase the personal, familial, and societal accountability of persons
experiencing homelessness.
(6) To reduce prison overcrowding.
(7) To provide employment and job training for those experiencing
homelessness.
Page 2 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(8) To provide housing assistance for those experiencing homelessness in
partnership with state, local, and federal housing authorities and nonprofit
organizations.
(9) To provide counseling services as necessary.
§5384. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Homelessness Court program" means a program with all of the
following essential characteristics:
(a) The integration of health care, education, and housing assistance as well
as employment, job training, disability compensation counseling, and other
rehabilitative services in the processing of cases in the criminal justice system.
(b) Early identification and prompt placement of eligible participants in the
program for the purpose of making them program participants.
(c) The use of a nonadversarial approach involving prosecutors and defense
attorneys to promote public safety and protect the due process rights of program
participants.
(d) Access to continuum of alcohol, controlled substance, mental health,
suicide assessment, intervention, treatment and management, and other related
treatment and rehabilitative services.
(e) Careful monitoring of treatment and services provided to program
participants.
(f) A coordinated strategy to govern program responses to compliance of
participants.
(g) Ongoing judicial interaction with program participants.
(h) Monitoring and evaluation of program goals and effectiveness.
(i) Continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective program
planning, implementation, and operations.
(j) Development of partnerships with public agencies and community
organizations, including but not limited to Louisiana Works, the United States
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
Department of Housing and Urban Development, and any other local, state, or
federal agency or organization that can provide assistance to participants.
(2) "Participant" means a person currently experiencing homelessness who
is subject to the jurisdiction of the Homelessness Court program. Participant may
also refer to a person, defendant, probationer, or offender in relation to the program.
§5385. The Homelessness Court program; administration; eligibility; stipulations
A. Each district court by rule may designate as a Homelessness Court
program one or more divisions of the district court to which participants are assigned
and may establish a probation program to be administered by the presiding judge or
judges thereof or by an employee designated by the court.
B. Participation in probation programs shall be subject to all of the following
provisions:
(1) The district attorney may propose to the court that a defendant be
screened for eligibility as a participant in the Homelessness Court program if all of
the following criteria are satisfied:
(a) The individual is arrested or issued a written summons for a
misdemeanor or felony violation of state law and is determined to be a person
experiencing homelessness.
(b) The district attorney has reason to believe that the defendant who is
charged may benefit by participating in the Homelessness Court program.
(c) The district attorney has reason to believe that it is in the best interest of
the community and in the interest of justice to provide the defendant with treatment
as opposed to incarceration or other sanctions.
(2) Upon receipt of the proposal provided in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the court shall advise the defendant that he may be eligible for
enrollment in a court-authorized treatment program through the Homelessness Court
program.
(3)(a) If the defendant requests to undergo treatment and is accepted into the
Homelessness Court program, the defendant shall be placed under the supervision
of the Homelessness Court program for a period of not less than twelve months.
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(b) During the treatment, the defendant may be confined in a treatment
facility or, at the discretion of the court, the defendant may be released on a
probationary basis for treatment or supervised aftercare in the community.
(c) The court may impose any conditions reasonably related to the complete
rehabilitation of the defendant.
(d) The defendant shall be required to participate in any court-ordered
alcohol and drug testing program at his own expense, unless the court determines
that he is indigent.
(e) If the defendant completes the Homelessness Court program and has
successfully completed all other requirements of his court-ordered probation, the
conviction may be set aside and the prosecution dismissed in accordance with Code
of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894. A defendant's successful completion
of the Homelessness Court program and the other requirements of probation may
result in his discharge from supervision. If the defendant does not successfully
complete the Homelessness Court program, the judge may do any of the following:
(i) Revoke the probation and impose sentence.
(ii) Revoke the probation and order the defendant to serve the sentence
previously imposed and suspended.
(iii) Revoke the probation and order the defendant to be committed to the
custody of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections with a requirement that
the defendant serve a sentence of not more than six months without diminution of
sentence in the intensive incarceration program pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4.4 and
574.5, with return to the regular Homelessness Court docket upon completion of
sentence.
(iv) Impose any sanction provided by Code of Criminal Procedure Article
900 or extend probation and order that the defendant continue treatment for an
additional period, or both.
(4) The defendant has the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of
a criminal prosecution and in any court hearing relating to the Homelessness Court
program. The defendant shall be represented by counsel during the negotiations to
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
determine eligibility to participate in the Homelessness Court program and shall be
represented by counsel at the time of the execution of the probation agreement and
at any hearing pertaining to the revocation of the defendant's probation and discharge
from the program, unless the court finds and the record shows that the defendant has
knowingly and intelligently waived his right to counsel.
(5) If the defendant elects to undergo treatment and participate in the
Homelessness Court program, the court shall order an examination of the defendant
by one of the court's designated licensed treatment programs. Treatment programs
shall possess sufficient experience in working with criminal justice participants with
alcohol or drug addictions, mental health problems, or all of these matters, and shall
be certified and approved by this state. The designated treatment program shall
utilize standardized testing and evaluation procedures to determine whether or not
the defendant is an appropriate candidate for a treatment program and shall report
such findings to the court and the district attorney.
(6) The treatment program examiner or district attorney may request that the
defendant provide all of the following information to the court:
(a) Information regarding prior criminal charges.
(b) Education, work experience, and training.
(c) Family history, including residence in the community.
(d) Medical and mental history, including any psychiatric or psychological
treatment or counseling.
(e) Any other information reasonably related to the success of the treatment
program.
(7) The designated program shall recommend to the court a preliminary
length of stay and level of care for the defendant.
(8) In addition to the report submitted by the examiner, the judge and district
attorney shall consider the following factors in determining whether the
Homelessness Court program would be in the interest of justice and of benefit to the
defendant and the community:
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(a) The nature of the crime charged and the circumstances surrounding the
crime.
(b) Any special characteristics or circumstances of the defendant.
(c) Whether the defendant is a first-time offender and the degree of success
attained if the defendant has previously participated in this program or a similar
program.
(d) Whether there is a probability that the defendant will cooperate with and
benefit from probation and treatment through the Homelessness Court program.
(e) Whether the available Homelessness Court program is appropriate to
meet the needs of the defendant.
(f) The impact of the defendant's probation and treatment upon the
community.
(g) Recommendations of the involved law enforcement agency, if any.
(h) Recommendations of the victim, if any.
(i) Provisions for and the likelihood of obtaining restitution from the
defendant over the course of his probation.
(j) Any mitigating circumstances.
(k) Any other circumstances reasonably related to the defendant's case.
(9) In order to be eligible for the Homelessness Court program, the defendant
shall satisfy each of the following criteria:
(a) The defendant shall not have a prior felony conviction for any of the
following:
(i) Homicide as defined in R.S. 14:29.
(ii) A sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
(iii) A crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B).
(b) The crime before the court is not a charge of driving while impaired by
alcohol or any other drug or drugs that resulted in the death of a person.
(10)(a) The judge shall make the final determination of eligibility. If, based
on the examiner's report and the recommendations of the district attorney and the
defense counsel, the judge determines that the defendant should be enrolled in the
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
Homelessness Court program, the court shall accept the defendant's guilty plea,
suspend or defer the imposition of sentence, and place the defendant on probation
under the terms and conditions of the Homelessness Court program. The court may
also impose and suspend the execution of sentence and place the defendant on
probation under the terms and conditions of the Homelessness Court program.
(b) If the judge determines that the defendant is not qualified for enrollment,
the judge may state for the record the reasons for that determination.
(c) A Homelessness Court program team or staff may petition the court to
reject a referral to the Homelessness Court program if the Homelessness Court
program team or staff deems the defendant to be inappropriate for admission to the
Homelessness Court program. Additionally, a Homelessness Court program team
or staff may petition the court for immediate discharge of any individual who fails
to comply with Homelessness Court program rules and treatment expectations or
who refuses to constructively engage in the treatment process.
C.(1) In offering a defendant the opportunity to request treatment, the court
shall advise the defendant of the following at the time of the guilty plea:
(a) If the defendant is accepted into the Homelessness Court program, then
the defendant shall waive the right to a trial. The defendant shall enter a plea of
guilty to the charge with the stipulation that his sentencing be deferred or that
sentence be imposed, but suspended, and the defendant placed on supervised
probation under the usual conditions of probation and under certain special
conditions of probation related to the completion of such treatment programs as are
ordered by the court. During participation in the program, the defendant shall be
subject to nonadversarially determined sanctions. All adversarial hearings shall
occur during probation violation hearings.
(b) The terms of each probation agreement shall be decided by the judge.
The defendant shall agree to enter the program and sign a probation agreement
stating the terms and conditions of his program. The defendant shall plead guilty to
the charge in order to be eligible for the Homelessness Court program.
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(2) Any probation agreement entered into pursuant to this Section shall
include all of the following:
(a) The terms of the agreement, which shall provide for either of the
following:
(i) If the defendant fulfills the obligations of the agreement, as determined
by the court, then the criminal charges may be dismissed and the prosecution set
aside in accordance with Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894.
(ii) If the defendant has been sentenced following the plea of guilty, then the
successful completion of the Homelessness Court program may result in the
discharge of the defendant from continued supervision.
(b) A waiver by the defendant of the right to trial by jury under the
Constitution of Louisiana, the Constitution of the United States, and applicable laws.
(c) The defendant's full name.
(d) The defendant's full name at the time the complaint was filed, if different
from the defendant's current name.
(e) The defendant's sex and date of birth.
(f) The crime before the court.
(g) The date the complaint was filed.
(h) The court in which the agreement was filed.
(i) A stipulation of the facts upon which the charge was based, as agreed to
by the defendant and the district attorney.
(j) A provision that the defendant may be required to pay a probation
supervision fee if ordered by the court.
(k) A provision, in cases where applicable, that the defendant may be
required to pay restitution to the victim.
(l) A provision that the defendant, if ordered by the court, shall participate
in appropriate job training or schooling or seek gainful employment once the
defendant is receiving treatment as an outpatient or living in a halfway house.
(m) A copy of the plea agreement.
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(3) To the extent of his financial resources, a defendant who is placed under
the supervision of the Homelessness Court program may be required to pay a portion
of or the entire cost of the treatment program to which he is assigned and the cost of
any additional supervision that may be required, as determined by the Homelessness
Court program.
(4) If the defendant does not have the financial resources to pay all the
related costs of the probation program, any of the following may occur:
(a) The court, to the extent practicable, shall arrange for the defendant to be
assigned to a treatment program funded by the state or federal government.
(b) The court, with the recommendation of the treatment program, may order
the defendant to perform supervised work for the benefit of the community in lieu
of paying all or a part of the costs relating to his treatment and supervision. The
work shall be performed for and under the supervising authority of a parish,
municipality, or other political subdivision or agency of this state or a charitable
organization that renders service to the community or its residents.
(c) Any and all fees may be waived at the discretion of the court.
D.(1) When appropriate, the imposition or execution of sentence shall be
postponed while the defendant is enrolled in the treatment program. The defendant
shall remain on probation as long as he follows the conditions of his agreement.
(2) The district attorney, at the conclusion of the period of probation and on
advice of the person providing the defendant's treatment and the probation officer,
may recommend that the court take one of the following courses of action:
(a)(i) Revoke the defendant's probation and sentence the defendant because
he has not successfully completed the treatment and has violated one or more
conditions of probation.
(ii) If the defendant has already been sentenced, revoke the probation and
remand the defendant to the appropriate custodian for service of that sentence.
(b) Extend the period of probation so that the defendant may continue the
program.
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(c) Set aside the defendant's conviction and dismiss the prosecution because
the defendant has successfully completed all the conditions of his probation and
treatment agreement.
(3) The district attorney shall make the final determination on whether to
request revocation, extension, or dismissal.
(4)(a) The treatment supervisor, probation officer, or the district attorney
may file a motion with the court to request a hearing to determine if the defendant
may remain in the program or whether the probation may be revoked and the
defendant be removed from the program and sentenced or ordered to serve any
sentence previously imposed if either of the following occur:
(i) The defendant enrolled in a program violates any condition of his
probation or his treatment agreement.
(ii) The defendant appears to be performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned
program.
(b) The defendant may be removed from the program or his treatment
agreement may be changed to meet the defendant's specific needs if, at the hearing,
the moving party shows sufficient proof that the defendant has violated his probation
or his treatment agreement and has not shown a willingness to submit to
rehabilitation.
(c) If the court finds that the defendant has violated a condition of his
probation or a provision of his probation agreement and that the defendant should be
removed from the probation program, the court may do either of the following:
(i) Revoke the probation and sentence of the defendant in accordance with
his guilty plea.
(ii) If the defendant has been sentenced and the sentence suspended, order
the defendant to begin serving the sentence.
(d) A defendant who has been admitted to the probation program, fails to
complete the program, and is then sentenced to jail time for the offense shall receive
credit for the time served in any correctional facility in connection with the charge
before the court.
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
(e) The defendant, his probation officer, the district attorney, or his treatment
provider may petition the court at any time and for any appropriate reason to
reconsider, suspend, or modify its order for rehabilitation or treatment concerning
that defendant.
(f) The burden of proof at all such hearings shall be the burden of proof
required to revoke probation as provided by law.
E. The appropriate treatment program shall report the following changes or
conditions to the district attorney at any periodic reporting period specified by the
court:
(1) The defendant is changed from an inpatient to an outpatient.
(2) The defendant is transferred to another treatment center or program.
(3) The defendant fails to comply with program rules and treatment
expectations.
(4) The defendant refuses to engage constructively in the treatment process.
(5) The defendant terminates his participation in the treatment program.
(6) The defendant is rehabilitated or has obtained the maximum benefits of
rehabilitation or treatment.
F. The judge, after receiving the recommendation from the district attorney
upon the defendant's successful completion of the Homelessness Court program and
its terms and conditions, may vacate the judgment of conviction and dismiss the
criminal proceedings against the defendant or may discharge the defendant from
probation in accordance with Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 or 894.
G. Discharge and dismissal pursuant to this Chapter, as provided in Code of
Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894, shall have the same effect as an acquittal,
except that the conviction may be considered in order to provide the basis for
subsequent prosecution of the party as a multiple offender and shall be considered
as an offense for the purposes of any other law or laws relating to cumulation of
offenses. Dismissal pursuant to this Chapter shall occur only once with respect to
any defendant. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed as a basis for the
destruction of records of the arrest and prosecution of the defendant.
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
H. Nothing contained in this Chapter confers a right or an expectation of a
right to treatment for a defendant or offender within the criminal justice system.
I. Each defendant shall contribute to the cost of any treatment received in the
Homelessness Court program based upon guidelines developed by the Homelessness
Court program. Any and all fees may be waived at the discretion of the court.
J. Each judicial district that establishes a Homelessness Court probation
program shall adopt written policies and guidelines for the implementation of a
probation program in accordance with this Chapter. The policies and guidelines
shall include provisions concerning all of the following:
(1) How to examine the defendant initially to determine if he is qualified for
enrollment.
(2) How to advise the defendant of the program if the court has reason to
believe the defendant may suffer from alcohol or drug addiction or mental health
problems or illnesses.
(3) What licensed treatment programs are certified by the court.
K. Each Homelessness Court program shall develop a method of evaluation
so that its effectiveness can be measured. These evaluations shall be compiled
annually and transmitted to the judicial administrator of the Louisiana Supreme
Court.
L.(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, the registration and other records
of a treatment facility are confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person not
connected with the treatment facility or the Homelessness Court program and district
attorney without the consent of the patient.
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection do not restrict the use
of patients' records for the purpose of research into the cause and treatment of
alcoholism and drug addiction and mental health illnesses, provided that such
information shall not be published in a way that discloses the patient's name and
identifying information.
M. No statement or any information procured with respect to the specific
offenses of which the defendant is charged, which is provided to any probation
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
officer or program treatment worker subsequent to the granting of probation, shall
be admissible in any civil or criminal action or proceeding, except a Homelessness
Court program probation revocation proceeding.
N. A record of the fact that a defendant has participated in a Homelessness
Court program shall be sent to the office of the attorney general and shall be made
available upon request to any district attorney for the purpose of determining
previous participation in a Homelessness Court program.
§5386. Dismissal of certain criminal charges upon completion of Homelessness
Court probation program
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and when it
appears that the best interests of the public and of the defendant will be served, the
court may, with the prior approval of the district attorney, defer proceedings and
place any defendant eligible for participation in a Homelessness Court program on
probation with reasonable terms and conditions as may be required by the court and
in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
B. Upon the defendant's violation of any of the terms or conditions of his
probation, the court may revoke his probation, enter an adjudication of guilt, and
impose sentence upon the defendant. The entering of the adjudication of guilt shall
be retroactive to the date the defendant pled guilty or was convicted pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section, but the imposition or execution of sentence shall not
be retroactive.
C. The court shall discharge the defendant and dismiss the proceedings
against him upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of probation imposed in
accordance with this Section.
D. The discharge and dismissal of charges pursuant to this Section shall be
without court adjudication of guilt and shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes
of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime,
including the additional penalties imposed for second or subsequent convictions
pursuant to R.S. 40:982. The discharge and dismissal of charges pursuant to this
Section may occur only once with respect to any defendant.
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
E. The good-faith enforcement, investigation, citation, or prosecution of an
alleged violation of this Section by a political subdivision or its officers or employees
is a policymaking or discretionary act within the meaning of R.S. 9:2798.1, and the
immunity provided by that Section shall apply.
Section 2. R.S. 14:107.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§107.6. Unauthorized camping on public property
A. Unauthorized camping on public property is the intentional use of any
tent, shelter, or bedding constructed or arranged for the purpose of or in such a way
to permit overnight use on public property that is not a designated campground.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Designated campgrounds" mean any area or portion of an area of public
property that has been designed, designated, or approved by a public entity for the
allowable purpose of overnight use, such as camping.
(2) "Public property" means any property owned or controlled by the state
or any local or political subdivision of this state.
C. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more
than five hundred dollars, imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
D. An offender who violates the provisions of this Section may be eligible
for the Homelessness Court program, if such a program is available in the
jurisdiction and the offender meets all of the requirements set forth in Chapter 33-D
of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 for participation in the
program.
E. An offender who violates the provisions of this Section may be eligible for
participation in a Veterans Court program, if such a program is available in the
jurisdiction and the offender meets all of the requirements set forth in Chapter 33-B
of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 for participation in the program.
Section 3. Part IV of Chapter 3 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:581.1 through 582, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
PART IV. HOMELESSNESS
§581.1. Public camping; policy; definitions
A. To protect the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state, the
purpose of this Part is to prohibit camping in public areas and rights-of-way not
specifically designated for that purpose.
B. As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(2)(a) "Public camping" means either of the following:
(i) Lodging or residing overnight in a temporary outdoor habitation used as
a dwelling or living space and evidenced by the erection of a tent, the presence of
bedding or pillows, or the storage of personal belongings for the purpose of
habitation.
(ii) Lodging or residing overnight in an outdoor space without a tent or other
temporary shelter.
(b) "Public camping" does not mean any of the following:
(i) Lodging or residing overnight in a motor vehicle that is registered,
insured, and located in a place where it is lawful to do so.
(ii) Camping for recreational purposes on property designated for such
purposes during the hours permitted by the recreational area.
(iii) Any camping, lodging, or other recreational activity in a state park
during the hours permitted by the state park.
§581.2. Prohibition of public camping; exceptions
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, no political
subdivision shall authorize or otherwise allow any person to regularly engage in
public camping on a public property, including but not limited to a public building
or its grounds or a public right-of-way under the jurisdiction of the political
subdivision.
B.(1) A political subdivision may, by majority vote of the political
subdivision's governing body, designate property owned by the political subdivision
or a municipality within the boundaries of the political subdivision to be used for a
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
period of one year and which may be redesignated annually for the purposes of
public camping subject to all of the following conditions:
(a) There are not sufficient open beds in homeless shelters in the political
subdivision for the homeless population of the political subdivision.
(b) The designated property is not contiguous with property designated for
residential use by the political subdivision in the local government comprehensive
plan and future land use map.
(c) The designated property would not adversely and materially affect the
property value or safety and security of other existing residential or commercial
property in the political subdivision and would not negatively affect the safety of
children.
(2) The political subdivision shall notify the department within ten days of
designating property for public camping in accordance with procedures established
by the department.
C.(1) If a political subdivision designates property of the political
subdivision or municipality to be used for public camping, it shall establish and
maintain minimum standards and procedures related to the designated property for
all of the following purposes:
(a) Ensuring the safety and security of the designated property and the
persons lodging or residing on the property.
(b) Maintaining sanitation, including but not limited to providing access to
clean and operable restrooms and running water.
(c) Coordinating with federal, state, local, and private entities to provide
access to behavioral health services, which shall include substance abuse and mental
health treatment resources.
(d) Prohibiting illegal substance use on the designated property and
enforcing such prohibition.
(2) Within thirty days after designating property for public camping, the
political subdivision shall publish the minimum standards and procedures on the
website of the political subdivision. The political subdivision and municipality shall
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
continue to make policies and procedures publicly available for as long as any
political subdivision property remains designated for public camping.
D. The department may inspect a designated property at any time and the
secretary may provide notice to the political subdivision with a recommendation that
the designated property be closed if he determines that the requirements of this
Section are no longer satisfied or if the surgeon general determines that there is a
public health threat or emergency. A political subdivision shall publish any notice
issued by the department on the website of the political subdivision within five
business days after receipt of the notice.
§581.3. Limitation of liability; public camping
A. Definitions. As used in this Section, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(1) "Covered entity" means any political subdivision, municipality, parish,
governing authority, special district, or other unit of local government, and the
officials, officers, employees, agents, contractors, and volunteers thereof acting
within the course and scope of their duties.
(2) "Designated property" means property designated for public camping
pursuant to R.S. 40:581.2, and any appurtenant access or service area.
(3) "Service provider" means any nonprofit, religious, faith-based, charitable,
mutual-aid, harm-reduction, healthcare, or educational organization that provides
covered services.
(4) "Volunteer" means any individual who, without compensation, provides
covered services, whether independently or on behalf of a service provider.
(5) "Covered services" means the provision, without compensation from the
recipient, of food, water, clothing, hygiene supplies, sanitation, transportation, basic
medical or first-aid services, mental health or substance use counseling or referral,
harm-reduction supplies and education to the extent permitted by law, legal aid,
employment or housing navigation, religious or pastoral counseling, and childcare
services to persons experiencing homelessness on or in connection with a designated
property.
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
B. Discretionary act immunity. The exercise or non exercise of any duty,
power, or function of a covered entity under this Part or under R.S. 14:107.6,
including the decision to designate, refuse to designate, close, or non renew a
designation; the adoption and enforcement of minimum standards under R.S.
40:581.2(C); the removal or relocation of persons or property; the provision of or
referral to services; and the response to a notice from the Louisiana Department of
Health, is a policymaking or discretionary act within the meaning of R.S. 9:2798.1,
and the immunity provided by that Section shall apply.
C. Premises immunity. A covered entity that designates, owns, leases,
manages, controls, or supervises a designated property shall be deemed an owner of
land used for purposes equivalent to recreational purposes within the meaning of
R.S. 9:2795, and the limitation of liability provided by R.S. 9:2795(B) and (E) shall
apply to the designated property. The immunity extended by this Subsection
includes, without limitation, claims for personal injury, illness, death, or property
damage arising from fire, explosion, smoke inhalation, drug or alcohol overdose,
communicable disease, exposure to weather, defects in the land or facilities, or the
acts or omissions of any other camper, guest, vendor, service provider, volunteer, or
third person on the designated property.
D. Service provider and volunteer immunity. A service provider, and any
volunteer, who in good faith and without compensation provides covered services
shall be deemed to be rendering service within the meaning of R.S. 9:2793, and the
immunity provided by that Section shall apply, except that the immunity extended
by this Subsection is not limited to emergency settings. This Subsection is in
addition to, and does not limit, any greater protection available under R.S. 9:2793.1,
2799, or 2799.1, the federal Volunteer Protection Act of 1997 (42 U.S.C. 14501 et
seq.), or the federal Bill Emerson Good Samaritan Food Donation Act (42 U.S.C.
1791).
E. Property removal and storage. Personal property of a person experiencing
homelessness that is removed from public property in connection with enforcement
of this Part or R.S. 14:107.6 shall be stored for not less than thirty days and returned
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
to the owner upon request, in accordance with procedures adopted by the covered
entity. A covered entity is not liable for property unclaimed after the storage period,
or for property that is contaminated or perishable or constitutes a public health or
safety hazard, when disposal is consistent with adopted procedures.
F. Federal and constitutional claims. Nothing in this Section limits any claim
arising under the Constitution of Louisiana, the Constitution of the United States, or
42 U.S.C. 1983.
G. Cumulative effect. The provisions of this Section are in addition to, and
not in derogation of, the immunities cross-referenced herein and any other applicable
immunity, indemnity, or limitation of liability under law.
§582. Housing and services for individuals experiencing homelessness
A. The department, in consultation with the office of state fire marshal, may
promulgate rules to establish minimum housing standards for emergency shelters,
community facilities, licensed group homes, and halfway houses, and shall consider
critical aspects such as safety, sanitation, privacy, and habitability.
B. The office of state fire marshal shall assist in the implementation of the
provisions of this Section by conducting inspections of emergency shelters,
community facilities, licensed group homes, and halfway houses to verify that the
housing options available to individuals experiencing homelessness are safe and
sanitary.
C. The department may do both of the following:
(1) Promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
to implement the provisions of this Section.
(2) Submit waivers from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
obtain funding to provide healthcare and housing services to individuals who are
experiencing homelessness and suffering from illnesses.
Section 4. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 211 ENROLLED
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(6) R.S. 13:1905, 2593, 3715.3, 3715.4, 3734, 4687, 5108.1, 5304, 5366(L),
5385(L)
* * *
Section 5. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Streets to Success Act."
Section 6. This Section and Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, and 7 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration
of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article
III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently
approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
Section 7. The provisions of Section 3 of this Act, including R.S. 40:581.3, shall
become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.